Utah statutes.
67-20-6.   Compensatory service worker workers' compensation medical benefits.

A compensatory service worker is considered a government employee for purposes of receiving workers' compensation medical benefits, which shall be the exclusive remedy for all injuries and occupational diseases as provided under:

(1)  Title 34A, Chapter 2, Workers' Compensation Act; and

(2)  Title 34A, Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act.

